Hawaii statutes.
§383-22 Weekly benefit amount; computation,
minimum and maximum. (a) In the case of an individual who has established
a benefit year prior to January 2, 1966, the individual's weekly benefit
amount shall be the amount appearing in column B in the table in this section
on the line on which, in column A of the table, there appears the total wages
paid to the individual for insured work in that quarter of the individual's
base period in which the total wages were highest.

(b) In the case of an individual whose benefit
year begins after January 4, 1992, the individual's weekly benefit amount shall
be, except as otherwise provided in this section, an amount equal to one
twenty-first of the individual's total wages for insured work paid during the
calendar quarter of the individual's base period in which such total wages were
highest. The weekly benefit amount, if not a multiple of $1, shall be computed
to the next higher multiple of $1. If an individual's weekly benefit amount is
less than $5, it shall be $5. The maximum weekly benefit amount shall be
determined annually as follows: On or before November 30 of each year the
total remuneration paid by employers, as reported on contribution reports
submitted on or before such date, with respect to all employment during the
four consecutive calendar quarters ending on June 30 of the year shall be
divided by the average monthly number of individuals performing services in the
employment during the same four calendar quarters as reported on the
contribution reports. The amount thus obtained shall be divided by fifty-two
and the average weekly wage (rounded to the nearest cent) thus determined. For
benefit years beginning January 1, 1992, but prior to January 1, 2008, and
beginning again on January 1, 2012, but prior to April 1, 2012, then beginning
again on January 1, 2013, seventy per cent of the average weekly wage shall
constitute the maximum weekly benefit amount and shall apply to all claims for
benefits filed by an individual qualifying for payment at the maximum weekly
benefit amount in the benefit year commencing on or after the first day of the
calendar year immediately following the determination of the maximum weekly
benefit amount. For benefit years beginning January 1, 2008, and ending
December 31, 2011, and beginning again on April 1, 2012, and ending December
31, 2012, seventy-five per cent of the average weekly wage shall constitute the
maximum weekly benefit amount and shall apply to all claims for benefits filed
by an individual qualifying for payment at the maximum weekly benefit amount in
the benefit year commencing on or after the first day of the calendar year
immediately following the determination of the maximum weekly benefit amount.
The maximum weekly benefit amount, if not a multiple of $1, shall be computed
to the next higher multiple of $1.

(Column A) (Column B) (Column C) (Column D)

High Basic Minimum Maximum

Quarter Weekly Qualifying Total
Benefits

Wages Benefit Wages in Benefit
Year

$ 37.50 - 125.00 $ 5.00 $ 150.00 $ 130.00

125.01 - 150.00 6.00 180.00 156.00

150.01 - 175.00 7.00 210.00 182.00

175.01 - 200.00 8.00 240.00 208.00

200.01 - 225.00 9.00 270.00 234.00

225.01 - 250.00 10.00 300.00 260.00

250.01 - 275.00 11.00 330.00 286.00

275.01 - 300.00 12.00 360.00 312.00

300.01 - 325.00 13.00 390.00 338.00

325.01 - 350.00 14.00 420.00 364.00

350.01 - 375.00 15.00 450.00 390.00

375.01 - 400.00 16.00 480.00 416.00

400.01 - 425.00 17.00 510.00 442.00

425.01 - 450.00 18.00 540.00 468.00

450.01 - 475.00 19.00 570.00 494.00

475.01 - 500.00 20.00 600.00 520.00

500.01 - 525.00 21.00 630.00 546.00

525.01 - 550.00 22.00 660.00 572.00

550.01 - 575.00 23.00 690.00 598.00

575.01 - 600.00 24.00 720.00 624.00

600.01 - 625.00 25.00 750.00 650.00

625.01 - 650.00 26.00 780.00 676.00

650.01 - 675.00 27.00 810.00 702.00

675.01 - 700.00 28.00 840.00 728.00

700.01 - 725.00 29.00 870.00 754.00

725.01 - 750.00 30.00 900.00 780.00

750.01 - 775.00 31.00 930.00 806.00

775.01 - 800.00 32.00 960.00 832.00

800.01 - 825.00 33.00 990.00 858.00

825.01 - 850.00 34.00 1020.00 884.00

850.01 - 875.00 35.00 1050.00 910.00

875.01 - 900.00 36.00 1080.00 936.00

900.01 - 925.00 37.00 1110.00 962.00

925.01 - 950.00 38.00 1140.00 988.00

950.01 - 975.00 39.00 1170.00 1014.00

975.01 -1000.00 40.00 1200.00 1040.00

1000.01 -1025.00 41.00 1230.00 1066.00

1025.01 -1050.00 42.00 1260.00 1092.00

1050.01 -1075.00 43.00 1290.00 1118.00

1075.01 -1100.00 44.00 1320.00 1144.00

1100.01 -1125.00 45.00 1350.00 1170.00

1125.01 -1150.00 46.00 1380.00 1196.00

1150.01 -1175.00 47.00 1410.00 1222.00

1175.01 -1200.00 48.00 1440.00 1248.00

1200.01 -1225.00 49.00 1470.00 1274.00

1225.01 -1250.00 50.00 1500.00 1300.00

1250.01 -1275.00 51.00 1530.00 1326.00

1275.01 -1300.00 52.00 1560.00 1352.00

1300.01 -1325.00 53.00 1590.00 1378.00

1325.01 -1350.00 54.00 1620.00 1404.00

1350.01 and over 55.00
1650.00 1430.00.

[L 1939, c 219, §3(c); am L 1941, c 304, §1, pt of subs 15;
RL 1945, §4215; am L 1945, c 19, §1(3); am L 1955, c 16, §1(a); RL 1955,
§93-21; am L 1959, c 11, §1(a); am L 1961, c 114, §1(a); am L 1965, c 250,
§1(a); HRS §383-22; am L 1977, c 148, §4; gen ch 1985; am L 1991, c 68, §3; am
L 2007, c 110, §1; am L 2010, c 2, §2; am L 2012, c 6, §1]

Note

The 2012 amendment applies retroactively to January 1, 2012.
L 2012, c 6, §7.

Cross References

Disaster unemployment benefits, see §209-41.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next